Wisconsin, session 2025, AB880.
do enact as follows:AB880,1Section 1. 66.0443 of the statutes is created to read:66.0443 Racing facilities. No political subdivision may create a private cause of action that is inconsistent with the limitations under s. 823.086.AB880,2Section 2. 823.086 of the statutes is created to read:823.086 Actions against racing facilities. (1) In this section:(a) “Person” does not include a county, city, village or town.(b) “Racing facility” means a racetrack, regardless of whether the racetrack is permanent or seasonal, and includes any spectator areas, garages, and associated grounds, buildings, or appurtenances used to conduct competitive motorsports races.(2) No racing facility may be found to be a public or private nuisance if all of the following apply:(a) The action alleging that the racing facility is a public or private nuisance is commenced by a person that owns real property that is within a 5-mile radius of the perimeter of the property on which the racing facility is located.(b) The racing facility was constructed or in operation before the person commencing the action purchased, or made improvements to, the real property described under par. (a).(3) The prohibition under sub. (2) does not apply if the racing facility makes a substantial and material expansion of operations that results in a significant increase in the overall intensity of use of the facility, including a demonstrable increase in the number of racing event days beyond historical patterns of operation existing at the time the person commencing an action acquired or improved the person’s property.AB880,3Section 3. Initial applicability.(1) The treatment of s. 823.086 first applies to actions commenced on the effective date of this subsection. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab880 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab880 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB880 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB880 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB880: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting